test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_O_waabooz_gt-glossing.yaml
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonswaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonsniwbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsniwbaniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozmishnaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozmishnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozmishnaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozmishnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozmishwaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozmishwaadig
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: waaboozmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozmishnaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozmishnaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozmishnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozmishnaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozmishnaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozmishnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozmishwaan
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozmishwaang
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozmishwaag
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: waaboozmishwaan
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozmishwaang
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: waaboozmishniwan
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: waaboozmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nwaaboozmishbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozmishbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozmishbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gwaaboozmishbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozmishbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozmishbaniig
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozmishbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozmishbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozmishbaniin
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozmishbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozminaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozminaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozminaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozminaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozminaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozminaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozmiwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozmiwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozmiwaabniig
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozmiwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozmiwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozminwibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozshinaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozshinaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozshinaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozshinaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozshinaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozshinaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozshiwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozshiwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozshiwaabniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozshiwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozshiwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozshinwibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozshinwibniing
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozoonymishnaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonymishnaandig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nwaaboozoonsmishnaanba
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nwaaboozoonsmishnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonymishnaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonymishwaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishwaadig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonsmishnaanba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishnaandig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gwaaboozoonsmishwaaba
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishwaadig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: waaboozoonymishniwba
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt: waaboozoonsmishniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozoonymishnaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozoonymishnaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozoonymishnaanig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: nwaaboozoonsmishnaanin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nwaaboozoonsmishnaaning
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nwaaboozoonsmishnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonymishnaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonymishnaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonymishwaan
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonymishwaang
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishwaag
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonsmishnaanin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonsmishnaaning
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishnaanig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gwaaboozoonsmishwaan
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gwaaboozoonsmishwaang
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishwaag
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: waaboozoonymishwaan
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozoonymishwaang
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: waaboozoonymishniwan
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: waaboozoonymishniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: waaboozoonsmishwaan
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: waaboozoonsmishwaang
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: waaboozoonsmishniwan
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: waaboozoonsmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonymishbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonymishbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonymishbaniig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonsmishbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonsmishbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonsmishbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonymishbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonymishbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonymishbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsmishbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsmishbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmishbaniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozoonymishbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonymishbaniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozoonsmishbaniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsmishbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozoonymishbaniin
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonymishbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonymishbaniig
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: waaboozoonsmishbaniin
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsmishbaniing
     X+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: waaboozoonsmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonyminaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonyminaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonyminaanbaniig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonsminaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonsminaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonsminaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonyminaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonyminaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonyminaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonymiwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonymiwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonymiwaabniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsminaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsminaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsminaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsmiwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsmiwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsmiwaabniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozoonymiwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonymiwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonyminwibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonyminwibniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozoonsmiwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsmiwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonsminwibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonyshinaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonyshinaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonyshinaanbaniig
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozoonsshinaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozoonsshinaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozoonsshinaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonyshinaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonyshinaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonyshinaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonyshiwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonyshiwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonyshiwaabniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsshinaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsshinaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsshinaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozoonsshiwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozoonsshiwaabniing
     2+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozoonsshiwaabniig
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozoonyshiwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonyshiwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonyshinwibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonyshinwibniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: waaboozoonsshiwaabniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsshiwaabniing
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: waaboozoonsshinwibniin
     3+waaboos+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: waaboozoonsshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: nwaaboozmishnaanbaniin
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nwaaboozmishnaanbaniing
     1+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nwaaboozmishnaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozmishnaanbaniin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozmishnaanbaniing
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gwaaboozmishnaanbaniig
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gwaaboozmishwaabniin
     2+waaboos+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gwaaboozmishwaabniing
